Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 3321.
Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the Uniform Principal and Income Act.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 3322.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Accounting period” means a calendar year unless another 12-month period is selected by a fiduciary. The term includes a portion of a calendar year or other 12-month period that begins when an income interest begins or ends when an income interest ends.

“Beneficiary” includes, in the case of a decedent’s estate, an heir, legatee, and devisee and, in the case of a trust, an income beneficiary and a remainder beneficiary.

“Fiduciary” means a personal representative or a trustee. The term includes an executor, administrator, successor, personal representative, special administrator, and a person performing substantially the same function.

“Income” means money or property that a fiduciary receives as current return from a principal asset. The term includes a portion of receipts from a sale, exchange, or liquidation of a principal asset, to the extent provided in subchapter 4 of this chapter.

“Income beneficiary” means a person to whom net income of a trust is or may be payable.

“Income interest” means the right of an income beneficiary to receive all or part of net income, whether the terms of the trust require it to be distributed or authorize it to be distributed in the trustee’s discretion.

“Mandatory income interest” means the right of an income beneficiary to receive net income that the terms of the trust require the fiduciary to distribute.

“Net income” means the total receipts allocated to income during an accounting period minus the disbursements made from income during the period, plus or minus transfers under this chapter to or from income during the period.

“Person” means an individual; corporation; business trust; estate; trust; partnership; limited liability company; association; joint venture; government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation; or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Principal” means property held in trust for distribution to a remainder beneficiary when the trust terminates.

“Remainder beneficiary” means a person entitled to receive principal when an income interest ends.

“Terms of a trust” means the manifestation of the intent of a settlor or decedent with respect to the trust, expressed in a manner that admits of its proof in a judicial proceeding, whether by written or spoken words or by conduct.

“Trustee” includes an original, additional, or successor trustee, whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

“Income beneficiary.”

The definitions of income beneficiary (subdivision 3322(5)) and income interest (subdivision 3322(6)) cover both mandatory and discretionary beneficiaries and interests.
There are no definitions for “discretionary income beneficiary” or “discretionary income interest” because those terms are not used in the Act.

Inventory value.

There is no definition for inventory value in this Act because the provisions in which that term was used in the 1962 Act have either been eliminated (in the case of the underproductive property provision) or changed in a way that eliminates the need for the term (in the case of bonds and other money obligations, property subject to depletion, and the method for determining entitlement to income distributed from a probate estate).

“Net income.”

The reference to “transfers under this Act to or from income” means transfers made under subsections 3324(a), 3362(b), 3372(b), 3373(b), 3374(a), and section 3376.

“Terms of trust.”

This term was chosen in preference to “terms of the trust instrument” (the phrase used in the 1962 Act) to make it clear that the Act applies to oral trusts as well as those whose terms are expressed in written documents.
The definition is based on the Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 4 (1959) and the Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 4 (Tent. Draft No. 1, 1996).
Constructional preferences or rules would also apply, if necessary, to determine the terms of the trust.

§ 3323.
Fiduciary duties; general principles.

In allocating receipts and disbursements to or between principal and income, and with respect to any matter within the scope of subchapter 2 or 3 of this chapter, a fiduciary:

shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with the terms of the trust or the will, even if there is a different provision in this chapter;

may administer a trust or estate by the exercise of a discretionary power of administration given to the fiduciary by the terms of the trust or the will, even if the exercise of the power produces a result different from a result required or permitted by this chapter;

shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with this chapter if the terms of the trust or the will do not contain a different provision or do not give the fiduciary a discretionary power of administration; and

shall add a receipt or charge a disbursement to principal to the extent that the terms of the trust and this chapter do not provide a rule for allocating the receipt or disbursement to or between principal and income.

In exercising the power to adjust under subsection 3324(a) of this title or a discretionary power of administration regarding a matter within the scope of this chapter, whether granted by the terms of a trust, a will, or this chapter, a fiduciary shall administer a trust or estate impartially, based on what is fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries, except to the extent that the terms of the trust or the will clearly manifest an intention that the fiduciary shall or may favor one or more of the beneficiaries. A determination in accordance with this chapter is presumed to be fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Prior Act.

The rule in Section 2(a) of the 1962 Act is restated in subsection 3323(a), without changing its substance, to emphasize that the Act contains only default rules and that provisions in the terms of the trust are paramount.
However, Section 2(a) of the 1962 Act applies only to the allocation of receipts and disbursements to or between principal and income.
In this Act, the first sentence of subsection 3323(a) states that it also applies to matters within the scope of subchapters 2 and 3.
Subdivision 3323(a)(2) incorporates the rule in Section 2(b) of the 1962 Act that a discretionary allocation made by the trustee that is contrary to a rule in the Act should not give rise to an inference of imprudence or partiality by the trustee.

The Act deletes the language that appears at the end of Section (2)(a)(3)(B) of the 1962 Act
(“and in view of the manner in which men of ordinary prudence, discretion and judgment would act in the management of their affairs”) because persons of ordinary prudence, discretion and judgment, acting in the management of their own affairs do not normally think in terms of the interests of successive beneficiaries. If there is an analogy to an individual’s decision making process, it is probably the individual’s decision to spend or to save, but this is not a useful guideline for trust administration.
No case has been found in which a court has relied on the “prudent man” rule of the 1962 Act.

Fiduciary discretion.

The general rule is that if a discretionary power is conferred upon a trustee, the exercise of that power is not subject to control by a court except to prevent an abuse of discretion.
Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 187.
The situations in which a court will control the exercise of a trustee’s discretion are discussed in the comments to § 187.
See also, id. at §
233, comment
p.

Questions for which there is no provision.

Subdivision 3323(a)(4) allocates receipts and disbursements to principal when there is no provision for a different allocation in the terms of the trust, the will, or the Act.
This may occur because money is received from a financial instrument not available at the present time (inflation-indexed bonds might have fallen into this category had they been announced after this Act was approved by the Commissioners on Uniform State Laws) or because a transaction is of a type or occurs in a manner not anticipated by the Drafting Committee for this Act or the drafter of the trust instrument.

Allocating to principal a disbursement for which there is no provision in the Act or the terms of the trust preserves the income beneficiary’s level of income in the year it is allocated to principal, but thereafter will reduce the amount of income produced by the principal.
Allocating to principal a receipt for which there is no provision will increase the income received by the income beneficiary in subsequent years, and will eventually, upon termination of the trust, also favor the remainder beneficiary.
Allocating these items to principal implements the rule that requires a trustee to administer the trust impartially, based on what is fair and reasonable to both income and remainder beneficiaries. However, if the trustee decides that an adjustment between principal and income is needed to enable the trustee to comply with subsection 3323(b), after considering the return from the portfolio as a whole, the trustee may make an appropriate adjustment under subsection 3324(a).

Duty of impartiality.

Whenever there are two or more beneficiaries, a trustee is under a duty to deal impartially with them.
Restatement of Trusts 3d: Prudent Investor Rule § 183 (1992).
This rule applies whether the beneficiaries’ interests in the trust are concurrent or successive.
If the terms of the trust give the trustee discretion to favor one beneficiary over another, a court will not control the exercise of such discretion except to prevent the trustee from abusing it.
Id. at § 183, comment
a.
“The precise meaning of the trustee’s duty of impartiality and the balancing of competing interests and objectives inevitably are matters of judgment and interpretation.
Thus, the duty and balancing are affected by the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust, not only at the outset but as they may change from time to time.”
Id. at § 232, comment

c.

The terms of a trust may provide that the trustee, or an accountant engaged by the trustee, or a committee of persons who may be family members or business associates, shall have the power to determine what is income and what is principal. If the terms of a trust provide that this Act specifically or principal and income legislation in general does not apply to the trust but fail to provide a rule to deal with a matter provided for in this Act, the trustee has an implied grant of discretion to decide the question.
Subsection 3323(b) provides that the rule of impartiality applies in the exercise of such a discretionary power to the extent that the terms of the trust do not provide that one or more of the beneficiaries are to be favored.
The fact that a person is named an income beneficiary or a remainder beneficiary is not by itself an indication of partiality for that beneficiary.

§ 3324.
Trustee’s power to adjust.

A trustee may adjust between principal and income to the extent the trustee considers necessary if the trustee invests and manages trust assets as a prudent investor, the terms of the trust describe the amount that may or must be distributed to a beneficiary by referring to the trust’s income, and the trustee determines, after applying the rules in subsection 3323(a) of this title, that the trustee is unable to comply with subsection 3323(b) of this title.

In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power conferred by subsection (a) of this section, a trustee shall consider all factors relevant to the trust and its beneficiaries, including the following factors to the extent they are relevant:

the nature, purpose, and expected duration of the trust;

the intent of the settler;

the identity and circumstances of the beneficiaries;

the needs for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation and appreciation of capital;

the assets held in the trust; the extent to which they consist of financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, tangible and intangible personal property, or real property; the extent to which an asset is used by a beneficiary; and whether an asset was purchased by the trustee or received from the settlor;

the net amount allocated to income under the other sections of this chapter and the increase or decrease in the value of the principal assets, which the trustee may estimate as to assets for which market values are not readily available;

whether and to what extent the terms of the trust give the trustee the power to invade principal or accumulate income or prohibit the trustee from invading principal or accumulating income, and the extent to which the trustee has exercised a power from time to time to invade principal or accumulate income;

the actual and anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and income and effects of inflation and deflation; and

the anticipated tax consequences of an adjustment.

A trustee may not make an adjustment:

that diminishes the income interest in a trust that requires all of the income to be paid at least annually to a spouse and for which an estate tax or gift tax marital deduction would be allowed, in whole or in part, if the trustee did not have the power to make the adjustment;

that reduces the actuarial value of the income interest in a trust to which a person transfers property with the intent to qualify for a gift tax exclusion;

that changes the amount payable to a beneficiary as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets;

from any amount that is permanently set aside for charitable purposes under a will or the terms of a trust unless both income and principal are so set aside;

if possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment causes an individual to be treated as the owner of all or part of the trust for income tax purposes, and the individual would not be treated as the owner if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

if possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment causes all or part of the trust assets to be included for estate tax purposes in the estate of an individual who has the power to remove a trustee or appoint a trustee, or both, and the assets would not be included in the estate of the individual if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

if the trustee is a beneficiary of the trust; or

if the trustee is not a beneficiary, but the adjustment would benefit the trustee directly or indirectly.

If subdivision (c)(5), (6), (7), or (8) of this section applies to a trustee and there is more than one trustee, a cotrustee to whom the provision does not apply may make the adjustment unless the exercise of the power by the remaining trustee or trustees is not permitted by the terms of the trust.

A trustee may release the entire power conferred by subsection (a) of this section or may release only the power to adjust from income to principal or the power to adjust from principal to income if the trustee is uncertain about whether possessing or exercising the power will cause one of the results described in subdivisions (c)(1)-(6) or (c)(8) of this section or if the trustee determines that possessing or exercising the power will or may deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in subsection (c) of this section. The release may be permanent or for a specified period, including a period measured by the life of an individual.

Terms of a trust that limit the power of a trustee to make an adjustment between principal and income do not affect the application of this section unless it is clear from the terms of the trust that the terms are intended to deny the trustee the power of adjustment conferred by subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Purpose and Scope of Provision.

The purpose of section 3324 is to enable a trustee to select investments using the standards of a prudent investor without having to realize a particular portion of the portfolio’s total return in the form of traditional trust accounting income such as interest, dividends, and rents.
Subsection 3324(a) authorizes a trustee to make adjustments between principal and income if three conditions are met: (1) the trustee must be managing the trust assets under the prudent investor rule; (2) the terms of the trust must express the income beneficiary’s distribution rights in terms of the right to receive “income” in the sense of traditional trust accounting income; and (3) the trustee must determine, after applying the rules in subsection 3323(a), that he is unable to comply with subsection 3323(b). In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust, the trustee is required to consider the factors described in subsection 3324(b), but the trustee may not make an adjustment in circumstances described in subsection 3324(c).

Section 3324 does not empower a trustee to increase or decrease the degree of beneficial enjoyment to which a beneficiary is entitled under the terms of the trust; rather, it authorizes the trustee to make adjustments between principal and income that may be necessary if the income component of a portfolio’s total return is too small or too large because of investment decisions made by the trustee under the prudent investor rule.
The paramount consideration in applying subsection 3324(a) is the requirement in subsection 3323(b) that “a fiduciary must administer a trust or estate impartially, based on what is fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries, except to the extent that the terms of the trust or the will clearly manifest an intention that the fiduciary shall or may favor one or more of the beneficiaries.”
The power to adjust is subject to control by the court to prevent an abuse of discretion.
Restatement (Second) of Trusts § 187 (1959).
See also, id. at §§ 183, 232, 233, comment
p
(1959).

Section 3324 will be important for trusts that are irrevocable when a state adopts the prudent investor rule by statute or judicial approval of the rule contained in the Restatement of Trusts 3d: Prudent Investor Rule.
Wills and trust instruments executed after the rule is adopted can be drafted to describe a beneficiary’s distribution rights in terms that do not depend upon the amount of trust accounting income, but to the extent that drafters of trust documents continue to describe an income beneficiary’s distribution rights by referring to trust accounting income, Section 3324 will be an important tool in trust administration.

Three conditions to the exercise of the power to adjust.

The first of the three conditions that must be met before a trustee can exercise the power to adjust — that the trustee invest and manage trust assets as a prudent investor - is expressed in this Act by language derived from the Uniform Prudent Investor Act, but the condition will be met whether the prudent investor rule applies because the Uniform Act or other prudent investor legislation has been enacted, the prudent investor rule has been approved by the courts, or the terms of the trust require it.
Even if a state’s legislature or courts have not formally adopted the rule, the Restatement establishes the prudent investor rule as an authoritative interpretation of the common law prudent man rule, referring to the prudent investor rule as a “modest reformulation of the Harvard College dictum and the basic rule of prior Restatements.”
Restatement of Trusts 3d: Prudent Investor Rule, Introduction, at 5.
As a result, there is a basis for concluding that the first condition is satisfied in virtually all states except those in which a trustee is permitted to invest only in assets set forth in a statutory “legal list.”

The second condition will be met when the terms of the trust require all of the “income” to be distributed at regular intervals; or when the terms of the trust require a trustee to distribute all of the income, but permit the trustee to decide how much to distribute to each member of a class of beneficiaries; or when the terms of a trust provide that the beneficiary shall receive the greater of the trust accounting income and a fixed dollar amount (an annuity), or of trust accounting income and a fractional share of the value of the trust assets (a unitrust amount).
If the trust authorizes the trustee in its discretion to distribute the trust’s income to the beneficiary or to accumulate some or all of the income, the condition will be met because the terms of the trust do not permit the trustee to distribute more than the trust accounting income.

To meet the third condition, the trustee must first meet the requirements of subsection 3323(a), i.e., she must apply the terms of the trust, decide whether to exercise the discretionary powers given to the trustee under the terms of the trust, and must apply the provisions of the Act if the terms of the trust do not contain a different provision or give the trustee discretion.
Second, the trustee must determine the extent to which the terms of the trust clearly manifest an intention by the settlor that the trustee may or must favor one or more of the beneficiaries.
To the extent that the terms of the trust do not require partiality, the trustee must conclude that she is unable to comply with the duty to administer the trust impartially.
To the extent that the terms of the trust do require or permit the trustee to favor the income beneficiary or the remainder beneficiary, the trustee must conclude that she is unable to achieve the degree of partiality required or permitted.
If the trustee comes to either conclusion - that she is unable to administer the trust impartially or that she is unable to achieve the degree of partiality required or permitted — she may exercise the power to adjust under subsection 3324(a).

Impartiality and productivity of income.

The duty of impartiality between income and remainder beneficiaries is linked to the trustee’s duty to make the portfolio productive of trust accounting income whenever the distribution requirements are expressed in terms of distributing the trust’s “income.”
The 1962 Act implies that the duty to produce income applies on an asset by asset basis because the right of an income beneficiary to receive “delayed income” from the sale proceeds of underproductive property under section 12 of that Act arises if “any part of principal ... has not produced an average net income of at least 1% per year of its inventory value for more than a year . . . .” Under the prudent investor rule, “[t]o whatever extent a requirement of income productivity exists, ... the requirement applies not investment by investment but to the portfolio as a whole.”
Restatement of Trusts 3d: Prudent Investor Rule § 227, comment i, at 34.
The power to adjust under subsection 3324(a) is also to be exercised by considering net income from the portfolio as a whole and not investment by investment. Subsection 3363(b) of this Act eliminates the underproductive property rule in all cases other than trusts for which a marital deduction is allowed; the rule applies to a marital deduction trust if the trust’s assets “consist substantially of property that does not provide the spouse with sufficient income from or use of the trust assets . . .” — in other words, the section applies by reference to the portfolio as a whole.

While the purpose of the power to adjust in subsection 3324(a) is to eliminate the need for a trustee who operates under the prudent investor rule to be concerned about the income component of the portfolio’s total return, the trustee must still determine the extent to which a distribution must be made to an income beneficiary and the adequacy of the portfolio’s liquidity as a whole to make that distribution.

For a discussion of investment considerations involving specific investments and techniques under the prudent investor rule, see Restatement of Trusts 3d: Prudent Investor Rule § 227, comments
k-p.

Factors to consider in exercising the power to adjust.

Subsection 3324(b) requires a trustee to consider factors relevant to the trust and its beneficiaries in deciding whether and to what extent the power to adjust should be exercised.
Section 2(c) of the Uniform Prudent Investor Act sets forth circumstances that a trustee is to consider in investing and managing trust assets.
The circumstances in Section 2(c) of the Uniform Prudent Investor Act are the source of the factors in subdivisions (3)-(6) and (8) of subsection 3324(b) (modified where necessary to adapt them to the purposes of this Act) so that, to the extent possible, comparable factors will apply to investment decisions and decisions involving the power to adjust.
If a trustee who is operating under the prudent investor rule decides that the portfolio should be composed of financial assets whose total return will result primarily from capital appreciation rather than dividends, interest, and rents, the trustee can decide at the same time the extent to which an adjustment from principal to income may be necessary under section 3324.
On the other hand, if a trustee decides that the risk and return objectives for the trust are best achieved by a portfolio whose total return includes interest and dividend income that is sufficient to provide the income beneficiary with the beneficial interest to which the beneficiary is entitled under the terms of the trust, the trustee can decide that it is unnecessary to exercise the power to adjust.

Assets received from the settlor.

Section 3 of the Uniform Prudent Investor Act provides that “[a] trustee shall diversify the investments of the trust unless the trustee reasonably determines that, because of special circumstances, the purposes of the trust are better served without diversifying.”
The special circumstances may include the wish to retain a family business, the benefit derived from deferring liquidation of the asset in order to defer payment of income taxes, or the anticipated capital appreciation from retaining an asset such as undeveloped real estate for a long period.
To the extent the trustee retains assets received from the settlor because of special circumstances that overcome the duty to diversify, the trustee may take these circumstances into account in determining whether and to what extent the power to adjust should be exercised to change the results produced by other provisions of this Act that apply to the retained assets.
See subdivision 3324(b)(5); Uniform Prudent Investor Act § 3, comment, 7B U.L.A. 18, at 29-30 (Supp. 2006); Restatement of Trusts 3d: Prudent Investor Rule § 229 and comments
a-e.

Limitations on the power to adjust.

The purpose of subdivisions (c)(1)-(4) is to preserve tax benefits that may have been an important purpose for creating the trust. Subdivisions (c)(5), (6), and (8) deny the power to adjust in the circumstances described in those subsections in order to prevent adverse tax consequences, and subdivision (c)(7) denies the power to adjust to any beneficiary, whether or not possession of the power may have adverse tax consequences.

Under subdivision (c)(1), a trustee cannot make an adjustment that diminishes the income interest in a trust that requires all of the income to be paid at least annually to a spouse and for which an estate tax or gift tax marital deduction is allowed; but this subsection does not prevent the trustee from making an adjustment that increases the amount of income paid from a marital deduction trust to the spouse.
Subdivision (c)(1) applies to a trust that qualifies for the marital deduction because the spouse has a general power of appointment over the trust, but it applies to a qualified terminable interest property (QTIP) trust only if and to the extent that the fiduciary makes the election required to obtain the tax deduction. Subdivision (c)(1) does not apply to a so-called “estate” trust.
This type of trust qualifies for the marital deduction because the terms of the trust require the principal and undistributed income to be paid to the surviving spouse’s estate when the spouse dies; it is not necessary for the terms of an estate trust to require the income to be distributed annually.
Treas. Reg. § 26.2056(c)-2(b)(1)(iii).

Subdivision (c)(3) applies to annuity trusts and unitrusts with no charitable beneficiaries as well as to trusts with charitable income or remainder beneficiaries; its purpose is to make it clear that a beneficiary’s right to receive a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of a trust’s assets is not subject to adjustment under subsection 3324(a). Subdivision (c)(3) does not apply to any additional amount to which the beneficiary may be entitled that is expressed in terms of a right to receive income from the trust.
For example, if a beneficiary is to receive a fixed annuity or the trust’s income, whichever is greater, subdivision (c)(3) does not prevent a trustee from making an adjustment under subsection 3324(a) in determining the amount of the trust’s income.

If subdivision (c)(5), (6), (7), or (8), prevents a trustee from exercising the power to adjust, subsection (d) permits a cotrustee who is not subject to the provision to exercise the power unless the terms of the trust do not permit the cotrustee to do so.

Release of the power to adjust.

Subsection 3324(e) permits a trustee to release all or part of the power to adjust in circumstances in which the possession or exercise of the power might deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden.
For example, if possessing the power would diminish the actuarial value of the income interest in a trust for which the income beneficiary’s estate may be eligible to claim a credit for property previously taxed if the beneficiary dies within ten years after the death of the person creating the trust, the trustee is permitted under subsection (e) to release just the power to adjust from income to principal.

Trust terms that limit a power to adjust.

Subsection 3324(f) applies to trust provisions that limit a trustee’s power to adjust.
Since the power is intended to enable trustees to employ the prudent investor rule without being constrained by traditional principal and income rules, an instrument executed before the adoption of this Act whose terms describe the amount that may or must be distributed to a beneficiary by referring to the trust’s income or that prohibit the invasion of principal or that prohibit equitable adjustments in general should not be construed as forbidding the use of the power to adjust under subsection 3324(a) if the need for adjustment arises because the trustee is operating under the prudent investor rule.
Instruments containing such provisions that are executed after the adoption of this Act should specifically refer to the power to adjust if the settlor intends to forbid its use.
See generally, Joel C. Dobris, Limits on the Doctrine of Equitable Adjustment in Sophisticated Postmortem Tax Planning, 66 Iowa L. Rev. 273 (1981).

Examples.

The following examples illustrate the application of section 3324:

Example (1)

B T is the successor trustee of a trust that provides income to A for life, remainder to B.
T has received from the prior trustee a portfolio of financial assets invested 20% in stocks and 80% in bonds.
Following the prudent investor rule, T determines that a strategy of investing the portfolio 50% in stocks and 50% in bonds has risk and return objectives that are reasonably suited to the trust, but T also determines that adopting this approach will cause the trust to receive a smaller amount of dividend and interest income.
After considering the factors in subsection 3324(b), T may transfer cash from principal to income to the extent T considers it necessary to increase the amount distributed to the income beneficiary.

B T has received from the prior trustee a portfolio of financial assets invested 20% in stocks and 80% in bonds. Following the prudent investor rule, T determines that a strategy of investing the portfolio 50% in stocks and 50% in bonds has risk and return objectives that are reasonably suited to the trust, but T also determines that adopting this approach will cause the trust to receive a smaller amount of dividend and interest income.
After considering the factors in subsection 3324(b), T may transfer cash from principal to income to the extent T considers it necessary to increase the amount distributed to the income beneficiary.

Example (2)

B T is the trustee of a trust that requires the income to be paid to the settlor’s son C for life, remainder to C’s daughter D.
In a period of very high inflation, T purchases bonds that pay double-digit interest and determines that a portion of the interest, which is allocated to income under section 3356, is a return of capital.
In consideration of the loss of value of principal due to inflation and other factors that T considers relevant, T may transfer part of the interest to principal.

Example (3)

B T is the trustee of a trust that requires the income to be paid to the settlor’s sister E for life, remainder to charity F.
E is a retired schoolteacher who is single and has no children.
E’s income from her social security, pension, and savings exceeds the amount required to provide for her accustomed standard of living.
The terms of the trust permit T to invade principal to provide for E’s health and to support her in her accustomed manner of living, but do not otherwise indicate that T should favor E or F. Applying the prudent investor rule, T determines that the trust assets should be invested entirely in growth stocks that produce very little dividend income.
Even though it is not necessary to invade principal to maintain E’s accustomed standard of living, she is entitled to receive from the trust the degree of beneficial enjoyment normally accorded a person who is the sole income beneficiary of a trust, and T may transfer cash from principal to income to provide her with that degree of enjoyment.

Example (4)

B T is the trustee of a trust that is governed by the law of State X.
The trust became irrevocable before State X adopted the prudent investor rule.
The terms of the trust require all of the income to be paid to G for life, remainder to H, and also give T the power to invade principal for the benefit of G for “dire emergencies only.” The terms of the trust limit the aggregate amount that T can distribute to G from principal during G’s life to 6% of the trust’s value at its inception.
The trust’s portfolio is invested initially 50% in stocks and 50% in bonds, but after State X adopts the prudent investor rule T determines that, to achieve suitable risk and return objectives for the trust, the assets should be invested 90% in stocks and 10% in bonds. This change increases the total return from the portfolio and decreases the dividend and interest income.
Thereafter, even though G does not experience a dire emergency, T may exercise the power to adjust under subsection 3324(a) to the extent that T determines that the adjustment is from only the capital appreciation resulting from the change in the portfolio’s asset allocation.
If T is unable to determine the extent to which capital appreciation resulted from the change in asset allocation or is unable to maintain adequate records to determine the extent to which principal distributions to G for dire emergencies do not exceed the 6% limitation, T may not exercise the power to adjust.
See Joel C. Dobris, Limits on the Doctrine of Equitable Adjustment in Sophisticated Postmortem Tax Planning, 66 Iowa L. Rev. 273 (1981).

Example (5)

B T is the trustee of a trust for the settlor’s child.
The trust owns a diversified portfolio of marketable financial assets with a value of $600,000, and is also the sole beneficiary of the settlor’s IRA, which holds a diversified portfolio of marketable financial assets with a value of $900,000.
The trust receives a distribution from the IRA that is the minimum amount required to be distributed under the Internal Revenue Code, and T allocates 10% of the distribution to income under subsection 3359(c).
The total return on the IRA’s assets exceeds the amount distributed to the trust, and the value of the IRA at the end of the year is more than its value at the beginning of the year.
Relevant factors that T may consider in determining whether to exercise the power to adjust and the extent to which an adjustment should be made to comply with subsection 3323(b) include the total return from all of the trust’s assets, those owned directly as well as its interest in the IRA, the extent to which the trust will be subject to income tax on the portion of the IRA distribution that is allocated to principal, and the extent to which the income beneficiary will be subject to income tax on the amount that T distributes to the income beneficiary.

Example (6)

B T is the trustee of a trust whose portfolio includes a large parcel of undeveloped real estate. T pays real property taxes on the undeveloped parcel from income each year pursuant to subdivision 3371(3).
After considering the return from the trust’s portfolio as a whole and other relevant factors described in subsection 3324(b), T may exercise the power to adjust under subsection 3324(a) to transfer cash from principal to income in order to distribute to the income beneficiary an amount that T considers necessary to comply with subsection 3323(b).

Example (7)

B T is the trustee of a trust whose portfolio includes an interest in a mutual fund that is sponsored by T.
As the manager of the mutual fund, T charges the fund a management fee that reduces the amount available to distribute to the trust by $2,000.
If the fee had been paid directly by the trust, one-half of the fee would have been paid from income under subdivision 3371(1) and the other one-half would have been paid from principal under subdivision 3372(a)(1).
After considering the total return from the portfolio as a whole and other relevant factors described in subsection 3324(b), T may exercise its power to adjust under subsection 3324(a) by transferring $1,000, or half of the trust’s proportionate share of the fee, from principal to income.